Hawaii statutes.
§437-26 License not transferable; other
requirements. (a) Nontransferable. No license issued under this chapter
shall be transferable.

(b) License to be posted. Each dealer shall
keep the license or a certified copy thereof posted in a conspicuous place on
each premises.

(c) License on person. Each salesperson shall
carry the salesperson's license on the salesperson's person or a certified copy
thereof and shall exhibit such license or certified copy thereof upon demand by
any person with whom the salesperson seeks to transact business as a motor
vehicle salesperson. [L 1963, c 199, §1m; Supp, §160-171.4; HRS §437-26; gen ch
1985, 1993]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next